Maine, session 132, LD488.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 38 MRSA §480-E, sub-§19 is enacted to read:
19. Fortification of residential building in, on or over coastal sand dune system
or coastal wetland. Notwithstanding any provision of this article to the contrary, the
department may authorize through a permit under this article the fortification of a
residential building located wholly or partially in, on or over a coastal sand dune system or
coastal wetland if:
A. The building to be fortified was in existence on January 1, 2025 and is located in:
(1) A high-velocity zone, or V-zone, as identified by the United States Department
of Homeland Security, Federal Emergency Management Agency in effective flood
insurance rate maps under the National Flood Insurance Program;
(2) An area of special flood hazard, as defined in section 436-A, subsection 1-C;
or
(3) An area that, as determined by the department, is otherwise at a high risk of
damage from storm surge, tidal erosion or other wave or water damage;
B. Fill used to fortify the building and placed in a coastal sand dune system, coastal
wetland or other protected natural resource:
(1) Does not exceed 500 cubic yards in total;
(2) Does not cover more than 2,500 square feet in total; and
(3) Is not placed more than 50 feet beyond the foundation of the building or the
posts or pilings on which the building is constructed;
C. All filled or otherwise fortified areas are covered with riprap or rocks of an
appropriate size and planted with native vegetation; and
D. The proposed fortification otherwise meets all applicable requirements adopted by
the department by rule.
The department shall adopt rules establishing standards for the fortification of a building
in accordance with this subsection. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary,
rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5,
chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.